Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201884-942
Private certification, defined.

Private certification means a nontransferable recognition granted to an individual by a private organization through a voluntary program in which the individual meets personal qualifications established by the private organization.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 10.
July 1, 2019